Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1148 Use of school facilities and
grounds. (a) All public school buildings, facilities, and grounds shall
be available for general recreational purposes, and for public and community
use, whenever these activities do not interfere with the normal and usual
activities of the school and its pupils. Any other law to the contrary
notwithstanding, the department shall adopt rules under chapter 91 as are
deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section and may issue
licenses, revocable permits, concessions, or rights of entry to school
buildings and grounds for such periods of use as deemed appropriate by the
department. All such dispositions, including those in excess of fourteen days,
need not be approved by the board of land and natural resources; provided that
approval by the board of land and natural resources shall be required when the
dispositions are for periods in excess of a year. The department may assess
and collect fees and charges from the users of school buildings, facilities, grounds,
and equipment, which include fees and charges assessed and collected by the
department for parking on roadways and in parking areas under the jurisdiction
of the department, pursuant to section 302A-1151.6. The fees and charges shall
be deposited into a separate fund and expended by the department under rules as
may be adopted by the board; provided that any parking fees assessed and
collected by a school shall be deposited to the credit of that school's
nonappropriated local school fund account.

(b) A separate subaccount of
the fund established pursuant to subsection (a), to be known as the
school facilities subaccount, shall be established for all
proceeds from the leases, permits, interest income generated from public school
lands, and other revenue generated from the nonpermanent disposition of public
school lands, including facilities, pursuant to section 302A-1151.1. The subaccount shall be governed by section 302A-1151.2. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L
2010, c 190, §3; am L 2013, c 155, §3]

Cross References

After-school and weekend programs, see §302A-408.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next